Maryland, session 2026, HB0077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 13–310.1 of Article – Commercial Law of the Annotated Code of Maryland
be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 51 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 51. TICKET RESALE CONSUMER PROTECTION AND TRANSPARENCY
ACT.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CONSUMER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 13–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 77 3
(C) “DIVISION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 13–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(D) “REGISTRANT” MEANS A PERSON REGISTERED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
TO RESELL A TICKET.
(E) (1) “RESALE” MEANS THE SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT SALE OF A
TICKET.
(2) “RESALE” INCLUDES A SALE BY ANY MEANS INCLUDING IN
PERSON, BY TELEPHONE, BY MAIL, BY E–MAIL, BY FACSIMILE, OR THROUGH A
WEBSITE OR OTHER ELECTRONIC MEANS.
(F) “RESELLER” MEANS A PERSON ENGAGED IN THE RESALE OF TICKETS.
(G) “SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE” MEANS AN ELECTRONIC
MARKETPLACE THAT ENABLES A PERSON TO SELL, PURCHASE, AND RESELL
TICKETS.
(H) (1) “SPECULATIVE TICKET” MEANS A TICKET THAT IS NOT IN THE
ACTUAL OR CONSTRUCTIVE POSSESSION OF A RESELLER AT THE TIME OF SALE,
ADVERTISEMENT, OR LISTING.
(2) “SPECULATIVE TICKET” INCLUDES A TICKET SOLD BY A
RESELLER THAT AT THE TIME OF RESALE:
(I) IS NOT IN THE PHYSICAL POSSESSION OF THE RESELLER;
(II) IS NOT OWNED BY THE RESELLER; OR
(III) IS NOT UNDER CONTRACT TO BE TRANSFERRED TO THE
RESELLER.
(I) “TICKET” MEANS PHYSICAL, ELECTRONIC, OR OTHER EVIDENCE THAT
GRANTS THE POSSESSOR OF THE EVIDENCE LICENSE TO ENTER A PLACE OF
ENTERTAINMENT FOR ONE OR MORE EVENTS AT A SPECIFIED DATE AND TIME.
(J) (1) “TICKET ISSUER” MEANS A PERSON THAT, DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY, ISSUES INITIAL TICKETS FOR AN ENTERTAINMENT EVENT.
(2) “TICKET ISSUER” INCLUDES:
(I) A MUSICIAN OR MUSICAL GROUP;

HOUSE BILL 77
(II) AN OPERATOR OF A VENUE;
(III) A SPONSOR OR A PROMOTER OF AN ENTERTAINMENT
EVENT;
(IV) A SPORTS TEAM PARTICIPATING IN AN ENTERTAINMENT
EVENT;
(V) A SPORTS LEAGUE WHOSE TEAMS ARE PARTICIPATING IN
AN ENTERTAINMENT EVENT;
(VI) A THEATER COMPANY;
(VII) A MARKETPLACE OPERATED FOR CONSUMERS TO MAKE AN
INITIAL PURCHASE OF TICKETS; AND
(VIII) AN AGENT OF ANY OF THE PERSONS LISTED IN ITEMS (I)
THROUGH (VII) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
14–5102.
(A) (1) A RESELLER THAT SELLS OR OFFERS TO SELL AT LEAST 50
TICKETS IN A CALENDAR YEAR SHALL REGISTER ANNUALLY WITH THE DIVISION TO
RESELL A TICKET IN THE STATE.
(2) IF A RESELLER LISTS A SINGLE TICKET ACROSS MULTIPLE
PLATFORMS, THE TOTAL NUMBER OF LISTINGS FOR THE TICKET SHALL COUNT
TOWARD THE REGISTRATION THRESHOLD IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) ANY ENTITY UNDER COMMON OWNERSHIP OR CONTROL OF AN
INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE CONSIDERED A SINGLE RESELLER FOR PURPOSES OF THE
REGISTRATION REQUIREMENT IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) A RESELLER SHALL APPLY FOR REGISTRATION USING AN APPLICATION
FORM PROVIDED BY THE DIVISION THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE APPLICANT’S FULL LEGAL NAME AND ANY ALIASES OR
USERNAMES USED TO RESELL TICKETS;
(2) THE APPLICANT’S CONTACT INFORMATION, INCLUDING A
PHYSICAL STREET ADDRESS, AN E–MAIL ADDRESS, AND A TELEPHONE NUMBER;
(3) THE APPLICANT’S SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER;

HOUSE BILL 77 5
(4) THE APPLICANT’S EMPLOYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER AND
CONTACT INFORMATION FOR ANY EMPLOYER;
(5) ANY ASSOCIATED ENTITY INVOLVED IN THE APPLICANT’S RESALE
OF TICKETS; AND
(6) ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE DIVISION.
(D) THE DIVISION SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN A LIST OF ALL REGISTRANTS THAT INCLUDES
INFORMATION ON EACH REGISTRANT’S VIOLATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE, IF ANY,
WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 5 YEARS;
(2) PUBLISH THE LIST ON THE DIVISION’S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE
WEBSITE; AND
(3) UPDATE THE LIST AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 30 DAYS.
(E) THE DIVISION MAY NOT PUBLICLY DISCLOSE INFORMATION PROVIDED
BY AN APPLICANT FOR A REGISTRATION UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS
SECTION.
(F) (1) EACH REGISTRANT SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DIVISION A REPORT
FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 6–MONTH PERIOD:
(I) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER JULY 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE
EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER; AND
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, AND ON OR
BEFORE EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF TICKETS THE REGISTRANT SOLD
DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD;
(II) THE ORIGINAL PURCHASE PRICE OF EACH INITIAL TICKET
PURCHASED BY THE REGISTRANT THAT THE REGISTRANT SOLD DURING THE
REPORTING PERIOD; AND

HOUSE BILL 77
(III) THE FINAL RESALE PRICE OF EACH TICKET THE
REGISTRANT SOLD DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD.
(G) (1) A REGISTRANT SHALL OBTAIN AND MAINTAIN A SURETY BOND OF
AT LEAST $10,000.
(2) THE SURETY BOND SHALL COVER COMPENSATION FOR LOST
FUNDS BY A CONSUMER, INCLUDING TRAVEL EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE
CONSUMER IF THE REGISTRANT FAILS TO DELIVER A PURCHASED TICKET OR
ENGAGES IN A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) THE DIVISION MAY ADJUST THE SURETY BOND AMOUNT FOR A
REGISTRANT BASED ON THE REGISTRANT’S SALES VOLUME AND CONSUMER
COMPLAINT HISTORY.
(4) A REGISTRANT SHALL SUBMIT EVIDENCE OF THE SURETY BOND
TO A SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE BEFORE LISTING ANY TICKET FOR RESALE.
(H) THE DIVISION MAY REVOKE OR SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OF A
REGISTRANT FOR ANY VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR A PERIOD OF:
(1) AT LEAST 1 YEAR; BUT
(2) NOT LONGER THAN 5 YEARS.
14–5103.
(A) A SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE SHALL:
(1) MAINTAIN RECORDS OF ALL REGISTRANTS THAT USE THE
SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE AND VERIFY THAT EACH REGISTRANT MEETS THE
REGISTRATION REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 14–5102 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) REPORT TO THE DIVISION ANY UNREGISTERED OR
NONCOMPLIANT RESELLERS SELLING OR OFFERING TO SELL A TICKET ON THE
SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE; AND
(3) MAINTAIN RECORDS OF ALL TICKET SALES ON THE SECONDARY
TICKET EXCHANGE, INCLUDING THE NUMBER OF TICKETS AND THE PRICE OF EACH
TICKET SOLD OR RESOLD.
(B) (1) EACH SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
DIVISION FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 6–MONTH PERIOD A REPORT:

HOUSE BILL 77 7
(I) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER JULY 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE
EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER; AND
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, AND ON OR
BEFORE EACH JANUARY 1 THEREAFTER.
(2) A REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF TICKETS THE REGISTRANT SOLD ON
THE SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD;
(II) THE ORIGINAL PURCHASE PRICE PAID BY THE REGISTRANT
OF EACH INITIAL TICKET THAT THE REGISTRANT SOLD DURING THE REPORTING
PERIOD; AND
(III) THE FINAL RESALE PRICE OF EACH TICKET THE
REGISTRANT SOLD DURING THE REPORTING PERIOD.
14–5104.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGES,
TICKET ISSUERS, AND RESELLERS.
(B) THE LISTING FOR A TICKET AND EACH STEP OF A TRANSACTION TO
PURCHASE A TICKET SHALL:
(1) CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSE THE TOTAL PRICE OF
THE TICKET, INCLUDING ALL FEES AND TAXES OTHER THAN SHIPPING COSTS THAT
ARE NOT DETERMINABLE AT A STEP IN THE TRANSACTION;
(2) PROVIDE AN ITEMIZED LISTING OF ALL CHARGES THAT
CONSTITUTE THE TOTAL PRICE OF THE TICKET, INCLUDING ALL FEES AND TAXES;
AND
(3) IDENTIFY THE SEAT NUMBER AND ZONE OR SECTION OF THE
TICKET, TO THE EXTENT APPLICABLE TO THE SEAT AND VENUE.
(C) (1) THE TOTAL PRICE OF A TICKET UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF
THIS SECTION MAY BE INCREASED IN A NONINITIAL STEP OF A TRANSACTION BY THE
AMOUNT OF REASONABLE SHIPPING COSTS FOR PHYSICALLY DELIVERED TICKETS.

HOUSE BILL 77
(2) THE SHIPPING COSTS ALLOWED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY VARY WITH THE PURCHASER’S LOCATION RELATIVE TO THE
SHIPMENT’S LOCATION OF ORIGIN AND THE DELIVERY METHOD SELECTED BY THE
PURCHASER.
(3) THE TOTAL PRICE OF THE TICKET, INCLUDING ALL FEES, TAXES,
AND SHIPPING COSTS, SHALL BE CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSED PRIOR
TO FINAL PURCHASE OF THE TICKET.
14–5105.
(A) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A FEE THAT A SECONDARY
TICKET EXCHANGE MAY CHARGE FOR THE SERVICE OF PROVIDING A MARKETPLACE
FOR THE RESALE OF A TICKET.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE TOTAL PRICE AT WHICH A RESELLER MAY SELL OR OFFER TO SELL
A TICKET MAY NOT EXCEED THE TOTAL PRICE OF THE INITIAL TICKET, INCLUDING
ALL FEES AND TAXES IN CONNECTION WITH THE INITIAL TICKET, PLUS 10% OF THE
TOTAL PRICE.
(II) IF INITIAL TICKETS WERE PURCHASED FOR A SERIES OF
EVENTS, SUCH AS SEASON TICKETS FOR A SPORTS TEAM, THE TOTAL RESALE PRICE
OF A TICKET FOR A SINGLE EVENT MAY NOT EXCEED THE TOTAL PRICE OF A
COMPARABLE SINGLE TICKET, INCLUDING ALL FEES AND TAXES, PLUS 10% OF THE
TOTAL PRICE.
(B) A SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE MAY NOT CHARGE FOR THE SERVICE
OF PROVIDING A MARKETPLACE FOR THE RESALE OF A TICKET A FEE THAT EXCEEDS
10% OF THE TOTAL PRICE, INCLUDING ALL FEES AND TAXES, OF THE INITIAL
TICKET.
14–5106.
A RESELLER MAY NOT SELL OR OFFER TO SELL A SPECULATIVE TICKET.
14–5107.
(A) A TICKET ISSUER, SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE, OR RESELLER THAT
DIRECTLY ENGAGES IN A SALES TRANSACTION WITH A PURCHASER FOR THE
PURCHASE OF A TICKET SHALL PROVIDE THE PURCHASER WITH A FULL REFUND OF
THE TOTAL AMOUNT PAID BY THE PURCHASER, INCLUDING THE PRICE OF THE
TICKET AND ANY FEES AND TAXES, IF:

HOUSE BILL 77 9
(1) THE TICKET PURCHASED IS COUNTERFEIT;
(2) THE EVENT FOR WHICH THE TICKET WAS PURCHASED IS
CANCELED; OR
(3) THE TICKET FAILS TO CONFORM TO THE DESCRIPTION AS
ADVERTISED OR REPRESENTED TO THE PURCHASER BY THE SELLER.
(B) A TICKET ISSUER, SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE, OR RESELLER SHALL
PROVIDE A REFUND REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN 10
DAYS AFTER:
(1) THE TICKET ISSUER, SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE, OR
RESELLER HAS KNOWLEDGE THAT:
(I) THE TICKET PURCHASED IS COUNTERFEIT; OR
(II) THE TICKET FAILS TO CONFORM TO THE DESCRIPTION AS
ADVERTISED OR REPRESENTED TO THE PURCHASER BY THE SELLER; OR
(2) THE EVENT FOR WHICH THE TICKET WAS PURCHASED IS
CANCELED.
14–5108.
(A) SUBJECT TO RESTRICTIONS IMPOSED BY A TICKET ISSUER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON MAY NOT
PROHIBIT OR RESTRICT THE TRANSFER OR RESALE OF A TICKET THAT WAS MADE
AVAILABLE TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC FOR PURCHASE UNLESS:
(1) THE PERSON CLEARLY AND CONSPICUOUSLY DISCLOSES TO THE
CONSUMER THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF TRANSFERABILITY; AND
(2) THE CONSUMER ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF THE DISCLOSURE
BEFORE FINAL PURCHASE OF THE TICKET.
(B) A PERSON MAY:
(1) ESTABLISH, MAINTAIN, AND ENFORCE RESTRICTIONS
CONCERNING CONDUCT, BEHAVIOR, AGE, OR PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY AT A
VENUE OR AN EVENT; AND

HOUSE BILL 77
(2) SET LIMITS ON THE QUANTITY OF TICKETS AN INDIVIDUAL MAY
PURCHASE.
14–5109.
A TICKET ISSUER AND A SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE SHALL TAKE
COMMERCIALLY AND TECHNOLOGICALLY FEASIBLE STEPS TO IMPLEMENT AND
MAINTAIN TECHNOLOGY DESIGNED TO PREVENT A MACHINE, DEVICE, COMPUTER
PROGRAM, OR COMPUTER SOFTWARE WITH OR WITHOUT HUMAN ASSISTANCE FROM
BYPASSING RESTRICTIONS DESIGNED TO LIMIT THE NUMBER OF TICKETS THAT CAN
BE PURCHASED BY AN INDIVIDUAL ON A PRIMARY OR SECONDARY TICKET
EXCHANGE.
14–5110.
A SECONDARY TICKET EXCHANGE MAY NOT PROVIDE A MARKETPLACE FOR
THE SALE OR RESALE OF A TICKET THAT VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE.
14–5111.
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
14–5112.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE TICKET RESALE CONSUMER
PROTECTION AND TRANSPARENCY ACT.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.